Georgia statutes. TITLE 3 Alcoholic Beverages
Article 1 General Provisions

3-4-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Barrel” means 53 gallons.

“Denatured alcohol” or “denatured distilled spirits” means alcohol, as defined in Code Section 3-1-2, to which denaturants have been added in order to render the alcohol unfit for beverage purposes or internal human medicinal use. As used in this paragraph, the term “denaturants” means materials authorized for use pursuant to Chapter 1 of Title 27 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as the same may now or hereafter be amended.

“Distiller” means a manufacturer.

“Fruit grower” means any person who grows peaches, apples, pears, grapes, or other perishable fruits in this state and who manufactures distilled spirits from the perishable fruits grown in this state.

History.

Code 1933, § 5A-2101, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1269, § 27; Ga. L. 2017, p. 406, § 1/SB 85.

The 2017 amendment,

effective September 1, 2017, added paragraph (1); and redesignated former paragraphs (1) through (3) as present paragraphs (2) through (4), respectively.

3-4-2.
Applicability of chapter to ethyl alcohol used for certain purposes.

This chapter shall not apply to ethyl alcohol intended for use or used for the following purposes:

For scientific, chemical, mechanical, industrial, medicinal, and culinary purposes;

For use by those authorized to procure ethyl alcohol tax free, as provided by federal law;

In the manufacture of denatured alcohol or denatured distilled spirits produced and used as provided by federal law;

In the manufacture of patented, patent, proprietary, medicinal, pharmaceutical, antiseptic, toilet, scientific, chemical, mechanical, and industrial preparations or products unfit for beverage purposes; or

In the manufacture of flavoring extracts and syrups unfit for beverage purposes.

Nothing contained in subsection (a) of this Code section shall prohibit the commissioner from promulgating reasonable rules and regulations with regard to ethyl alcohol intended for use or used for any of the above-mentioned purposes in order to ensure proper enforcement of this title.

History.

Ga. L. 1937-38, Ex. Sess., p. 103, § 13; Code 1933, § 5A-2102, enacted by Ga. L. 1980, p. 1573, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 3.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Ethyl alcohol and license requirement, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of Department of Revenue, Alcohol and Tobacco Tax Unit, Non-Beverage Alcohol, § 560-2-14.01.

3-4-3.
Retail dealer’s signs; signs advertising Georgia lottery.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this Code section, a licensed retail dealer in distilled spirits may display at the licensee’s place of business unilluminated signs, using letters not larger than eight inches in height, flat against the outside of the building, below the roof line, bearing the words “liquor,” “beer,” “wine,” “champagne,” or any combination thereof, and “package store” or “liquor store,” together with the trade name of the retail dealer. In addition to such signs flat against the outside of the building, the retail dealer may display at a location on the tract of property upon which the business is located, but not affixed to the building, one unilluminated sign using letters not larger than eight inches in height bearing the words “package store” or “liquor store” and the trade name of the retail dealer. Subject to any more restrictive size limitations contained in the ordinances of the political subdivision in which the place of business is located, a sign not affixed to the building may be no larger than 16 square feet in area.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this Code section, the commissioner shall be authorized by rules and regulations to permit licensed retail dealers in distilled spirits to display signs inside and outside their retail establishments which advertise or promote any lottery authorized under Chapter 27 of Title 50, the “Georgia Lottery for Education Act,” provided that such signs are in compliance with said Chapter 27 of Title 50 and the rules and regulations of the board of directors of the Georgia Lottery Corporation.

History.

Code 1981, §

3-4-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 623, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1073, § 1.